District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-933

Audit.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 488, ch. 397, § 33
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-933.
1981 Ed., § 29-1133.
1973 Ed., § 29-833.

Prior Codifications